Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202632-559
Political subdivision; special election; certification; cancellation; procedure.

(1)(a) Except as provided in section 77-3444, any issue to be submitted to the registered voters at a special election by a political subdivision shall be certified by the clerk of the political subdivision to the election commissioner or county clerk on or before the eighth Friday prior to the election. A special election may be held by mail as provided in sections 32-952 to 32-959. Any other special election under this section shall be subject to section 32-405.

(b) A political subdivision that has submitted an issue for a special election under subdivision (1)(a) of this section may cancel the special election if the Secretary of State, election commissioner, or county clerk receives a resolution adopted by the political subdivision canceling the special election on or before the fourth Thursday prior to the election. No cancellation shall be effective after such date. If a special election is canceled in such manner, the political subdivision shall be responsible for the costs incurred that are related to the canceled election. Such costs shall include all chargeable costs as provided in section 32-1202 associated with preparing for and conducting a special election.

(2)(a) In lieu of submitting the issue at a special election, any political subdivision may submit the issue at a statewide primary or general election or at any scheduled county election, except that no such issue shall be submitted at a statewide election or scheduled county election unless the issue to be submitted has been certified by the clerk of the political subdivision to the election commissioner or county clerk by March 1 for the primary election and by September 1 for the general election. After the election commissioner or county clerk has received the certification of the issue to be submitted, he or she shall be responsible for all matters relating to the submission of the issue to the registered voters, except that the clerk of the political subdivision shall be responsible for the publication or posting of any required special notice of the submission of such issue other than the notice required to be given of the statewide election issues. The election commissioner or county clerk shall prepare the ballots and issue ballots for early voting and shall also conduct the submission of the issue, including the receiving and counting of the ballots on the issue. The election returns shall be made to the election commissioner or county clerk. The ballots shall be counted and canvassed at the same time and in the same manner as the other ballots. Upon completion of the canvass of the vote by the county canvassing board, the election commissioner or county clerk shall certify the election results to the governing body of the political subdivision. The canvass by the county canvassing board shall have the same force and effect as if made by the governing body of the political subdivision.

(b) A political subdivision that has submitted an issue at a statewide primary or general election or at any scheduled county election under subdivision (2)(a) of this section may withdraw the issue from the ballot if the Secretary of State, election commissioner, or county clerk receives a resolution adopted by the political subdivision withdrawing the issue from the ballot no later than March 1 prior to a statewide primary election or September 1 prior to a statewide general election. No withdrawal shall be effective after such date. Any issue withdrawn in this manner shall not be printed on the ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 155;

Laws 1996, LB 964, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 306, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 521, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 6;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 23;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 7.
July 18, 2026
School bonds, special elections, see sections 10-703 and 10-703.01.